California, session 20252026, AB2561.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 22.9 (commencing with Section 22683) is added to Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code, to read: CHAPTER 22.9. Operating System and Application Privacy Settings22683. As used in this chapter:(a) “Application” means a software program, mobile app, or desktop app that collects, processes, or stores personal information about a user in the state and that provides privacy settings allowing the user to control the collection, use, sharing, or disclosure of that personal information.(b) “Consent” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1798.140 of the Civil Code.(b)(c) “Personal information” has the meaning defined in Section 1798.140 of the Civil Code.(c)(d) “Privacy setting” means any user-configurable option within an application application’s privacy, or similarly labeled, menu that governs the application’s collection, use, sharing, disclosure, retention, or processing of the user’s personal information.(a)An operating system or an application shall configure a user’s default privacy setting to be the most privacy protective setting offered by the operating system or application.22684. (b)An operating system or an application shall not change undo a user’s affirmative configuration of a privacy setting without the user’s explicit consent.